Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-240
State Board of Agriculture; convey easement.

The State Board of Agriculture is authorized by the Legislature to convey to the city of Lincoln, Nebraska, a permanent easement for the construction, reconstruction, inspection, maintenance, operation, and replacement of street improvements in, through, over, and under certain real estate legally described as follows:

(1) A portion of lot 79, irregular tract, located in the northeast quarter of section 13, township 10 north, range 6 east of the sixth principal meridian, in the city of Lincoln, Lancaster County, Nebraska, more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at the northeast corner of such lot 79; thence proceeding southerly along a line parallel to and 33 feet west of the east line of section 13, a distance of 61.04 feet; thence southwesterly deflecting 55 degrees right, a distance of 56.02 feet; thence northwesterly deflecting 90 degrees right, a distance of 50 feet; thence northeasterly deflecting 90 degrees right along the north line of such lot 79, a distance of 91.03 feet to the point of beginning; containing an area of 3,676.15 square feet, more or less; and

(2) A portion of lot 80, irregular tract, located in the northeast quarter of section 13, township 10 north, range 6 east of the sixth principal meridian, in the city of Lincoln, Lancaster County, Nebraska, more particularly described as follows:

Beginning at the northeast corner of such lot 80; thence proceeding southerly along a line parallel to and 33 feet west of the east line of section 13, a distance of 97.66 feet; thence northwesterly deflecting 145 degrees right, a distance of 80 feet; thence northeasterly deflecting 90 degrees right along the north line of such lot 80, a distance of 56.02 feet to the point of beginning; containing an area of 2,240.80 square feet, more or less.

Laws 1985, LB 33, § 1.